Utah statutes.
57-18-7.   Conservation easement not obtained through eminent domain -- Conservation easement may not interfere with eminent domain.

(1)  No conservation easement, or right-of-way or access to a conservation easement may be obtained through the use of eminent domain.

(2)  The existence of a conservation easement may not defeat or interfere with the otherwise proper exercise of eminent domain under Title 78B, Chapter 6, Part 5, Eminent Domain.



Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

